Georgia, session 2025_26, HB390.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "HALO Act."
SECTION 2.
Article 2 of Chapter 11 of Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
offenses against public order, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"16-11-46.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
H. B. 390
- 1 -

LC 39 4592
(1) 'First responder' means any firefighter, as defined in Code Section 16-10-24.1; peace
officer, as defined in Code Section 35-8-2; and emergency medical technician, as defined
in Code Section 16-10-24.2, who provides on-site care until the arrival and departure of
an ambulance service licensed under Chapter 11 of Title 31 or the termination of official
duties at the location of an emergency.
(2) 'Harass' means to knowingly and willfully engage in any conduct directed toward a
first responder which intentionally causes substantial emotional distress in that first
responder and serves no legitimate purpose.
(b) A person commits the offense of interference with a first responder when he or she,
after receiving a verbal warning not to approach from a person he or she knows or
reasonably should know is a first responder who is engaged in the lawful performance of
a legal duty, knowingly and willfully violates such warning and approaches or remains
within 25 feet of the first responder with the intent to:
(1) Impede or interfere with the first responder's ability to perform such duty;
(2) Threaten the first responder with physical harm; or
(3) Harass the first responder.
(c) A person convicted pursuant to this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of
a high and aggravated nature."
SECTION 3.
Code Section 17-6-12 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to unsecured
judicial release, requirement, effect of failure of person charged to appear for trial, and
consideration of criminal record, is amended in subsection (a) by striking "or" at the end of
subparagraph (DDD), by replacing the period at the end of subparagraph (EEE) with "; or",
and by adding a new subparagraph to read as follows:
"(FFF) Interfering with, threatening, or harassing a first responder at the scene of an
emergency, as described in Code Section 16-11-46."
H. B. 390
- 2 -

LC 39 4592
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 390
- 3 -